Hawaii statutes.
§605-5 License fee. The clerk of the
supreme court shall exact from every practitioner, upon the practitioner's
receiving a license, an admission fee of $10, for the benefit of the State. [CC
1859, §1073; RL 1925, §2308; RL 1935, §3607; RL 1945, §9705; RL 1955, §217-5;
HRS §605-5; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next